Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.055

Schools of medicine—Requirements for approval.

The commission may approve any school of medicine which is located in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or in the Dominion of Canada, provided that it:

(1) Requires collegiate instruction which includes courses deemed by the commission to be prerequisites to medical education;

(2) Provides adequate instruction in the following subjects: Anatomy, biochemistry, microbiology and immunology, pathology, pharmacology, physiology, anaesthesiology, dermatology, gynecology, internal medicine, neurology, obstetrics, ophthalmology, orthopedic surgery, otolaryngology, pediatrics, physical medicine and rehabilitation, preventive medicine and public health, psychiatry, radiology, surgery, and urology, and such other subjects determined by the commission;

(3) Provides clinical instruction in hospital wards and outpatient clinics under guidance.

Approval may be withdrawn by the commission at any time a medical school ceases to comply with one or more of the requirements of this section.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the commission to approve a school of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or osteopathic medicine, for purposes of qualifying an applicant to be licensed under this chapter by direct licensure, reciprocity, or otherwise.

[ 1996 c 178 s 5; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 309; 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 8; 1961 c 284 s 6; 1957 c 60 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.